test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NI_O_bagwaaniigin_gt-glossing.yaml
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignoonybaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonybaniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonybaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignoonsbaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonsbaniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonybaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonybaniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonybaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoonsbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonsbaniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsbaniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonybaniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonybaniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonybaniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonsbaniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsbaniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsbaniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonybaniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonybaniing
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonybaniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoonsbaniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsbaniing
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: nbagwaaniignomshinaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gbagwaaniignomshinaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gbagwaaniignomshiwaa
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: bagwaaniignomshiwaa
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: bagwaaniignomshini
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 6
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: nbagwaaniignomshiba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignomshidig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gbagwaaniignomshiba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignomshidig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: bagwaaniignomshiba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignomshidig
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: bagwaaniignomshiba
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignomshidig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: nbagwaaniignomshan
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: nbagwaaniignomshing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: nbagwaaniignomshan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: gbagwaaniignomshan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gbagwaaniignomshing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gbagwaaniignomshan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: bagwaaniignomshan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: bagwaaniignomshing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: bagwaaniignomshan
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+4: bagwaaniignomshan
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: bagwaaniignomshing
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: bagwaaniignomshan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 6
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: nbagwaaniignomnaanba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignomnaandig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt: gbagwaaniignomnaanba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignomnaandig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: gbagwaaniignomwaaba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignomwaadig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt: bagwaaniignomwaaba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignomwaadig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Prt: bagwaaniignomniwba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignomniwdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: nbagwaaniignomnaanin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: nbagwaaniignomnaaning
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: nbagwaaniignomnaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+4: gbagwaaniignomnaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Loc: gbagwaaniignomnaaning
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+1+Pl+Pl: gbagwaaniignomnaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: gbagwaaniignomwaan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: gbagwaaniignomwaang
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: gbagwaaniignomwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+4: bagwaaniignomwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Loc: bagwaaniignomwaang
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+2+Pl+Pl: bagwaaniignomwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+3+4+4: bagwaaniignomniwan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Loc: bagwaaniignomniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+3+4+Pl: bagwaaniignomniwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignombaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignombaniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignombaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignombaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignombaniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignombaniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: bagwaaniignombaniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignombaniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignombaniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+4: bagwaaniignombaniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignombaniing
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+ThmPos+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignombaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 6
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: nbagwaaniignoshnaanba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignoshnaandig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Prt: gbagwaaniignoshnaanba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoshnaandig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: gbagwaaniignoshwaaba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoshwaadig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Prt: bagwaaniignoshwaaba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoshwaadig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+4+Prt: bagwaaniignoshniwba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+4+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoshniwdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+4: nbagwaaniignoshnaanin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: nbagwaaniignoshnaaning
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: nbagwaaniignoshnaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+4: gbagwaaniignoshnaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gbagwaaniignoshnaaning
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gbagwaaniignoshnaanin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+4: gbagwaaniignoshwaan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gbagwaaniignoshwaang
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gbagwaaniignoshwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+4: bagwaaniignoshwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: bagwaaniignoshwaang
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: bagwaaniignoshwaan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+4+4: bagwaaniignoshniwan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+4+Loc: bagwaaniignoshniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+3+4+Pl: bagwaaniignoshniwan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignoshbaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignoshbaniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignoshbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignoshbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignoshbaniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignoshbaniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoshbaniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoshbaniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoshbaniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+4: bagwaaniignoshbaniin
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignoshbaniing
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Pej+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignoshbaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+4: nbagwaaniignonaanbaniin
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: nbagwaaniignonaanbaniing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: nbagwaaniignonaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignonaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignonaanbaniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignonaanbaniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+2+Pl+Prt+4: gbagwaaniignowaabniin
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gbagwaaniignowaabniing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gbagwaaniignowaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+2+Pl+Prt+4: bagwaaniignowaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignowaabniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignowaabniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+3+4+Prt+4: bagwaaniignonwibniin
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+3+4+Prt+Loc: bagwaaniignonwibniing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+3+4+Prt+Pl: bagwaaniignonwibniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+4: bgwaaniignoonyshibniin
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Loc: bgwaaniignoonyshibniing
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+Pej+Prt+Pl: bgwaaniignoonyshibniin
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+4: bgwaaniignoonsshibniin
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Loc: bgwaaniignoonsshibniing
     bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+Pej+Prt+Pl: bgwaaniignoonsshibniin
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonymishnaa
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsmishnaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonymishnaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonymishwaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsmishnaa
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsmishwaa
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: bagwaaniignoonymishwaa
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: bagwaaniignoonymishni
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsmishwaa
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4: bagwaaniignoonsmishni
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: nbagwaaniignoonymishba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonymishdig
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: nbagwaaniignoonsmishba
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsmishdig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gbagwaaniignoonymishba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonymishdig
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: gbagwaaniignoonsmishba
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsmishdig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: bagwaaniignoonymishba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonymishdig
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: bagwaaniignoonsmishba
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsmishdig
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: bagwaaniignoonymishba
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonymishdig
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt: bagwaaniignoonsmishba
     X+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Voc+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsmishdig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 7
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: nbagwaaniignoonymishan
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonymishing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonymishan
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: nbagwaaniignoonsmishan
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: nbagwaaniignoonsmishing
     1+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: nbagwaaniignoonsmishan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: gbagwaaniignoonymishan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonymishing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonymishan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: gbagwaaniignoonsmishan
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: gbagwaaniignoonsmishing
     2+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: gbagwaaniignoonsmishan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+4: bagwaaniignoonymishan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: bagwaaniignoonymishing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: bagwaaniignoonymishan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+4: bagwaaniignoonsmishan
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Loc: bagwaaniignoonsmishing
     3+bgwaaniigin+NI+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Pl: bagwaaniignoonsmishan
